Illinois, session 104th, HB949.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Lobbyist Registration Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 170/1)  (from Ch. 63, par. 171)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known as the the 8Lobbyist Registration Act.9(Source: P.A. 76-1848.)